src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-aqigi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - aʼigi: # adjectives 192 'eng /est äärne/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Nom: [aʼigi, aigi]
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Gen: aigīz
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Par: aigīzt
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Dat: aigīzõn
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Ins: aigīzõks
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Ill: aigīzõ
     aʼigi+A+Sg+Ela: aigīzõst
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Nom: [aʼigizt, aigizt]
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Gen: [aʼigizt, aigizt]
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Par: aigīži
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Dat: [aʼigiztõn, aigiztõn]
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Ins: [aʼigiztõks, aigiztõks]
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Ill: aigīžiz
     aʼigi+A+Pl+Ela: aigīžist
